Hawaii, session 2026, GM1116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 271G, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
”§271G- Automatic adjustment mechanisms; water carrier
inflationary cost index automatic adjustment mechanism.
The commission shall establish automatic adjustment mechanisms
for water carriers subject to this chapter to address inflation,
regulatory lag, and other economic factors. These mechanisms
may be initiated and established by the commission or upon
application by a water carrier. As provided in section
271G-17(f), these mechanisms shall be submitted as a
forty-five-day tariff transmittal filing or as part of a general
rate case application.
(b) By July 1, 2026, the commission shall establish a
water carrier inflationary cost index automatic adjustment
mechanism for each water carrier of property. The mechanism:
2026-2557 SB2694 GDI SMA-l.docx 1
■fflUHIIHIIIIIMHIIHMH

Page 2
S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
(1) Shall reflect the applicable annual percentage change
in the increase of wharfage rates set by the
department of transportation's harbors division,
pursuant to applicable administrative rules;
(2) Shall be applied on an annual basis through June 30,
2029, in accordance with subsection (c);
(3) May be applied on an annual basis beginning July 1,
2029, through June 30, 2033, in accordance with
subsection (d); and
(4) Shall be not more than five per cent per year.
(c) Beginning on July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2029, the
commission shall apply the mechanism as follows:
(1) In the first and second years, the water carrier
inflationary cost index automatic adjustment mechanism
shall be applied annually; and
(2) For the third year of the three-year cycle, regardless
of whether the water carrier is seeking any rate
changes for the transportation of property, the water
carrier shall submit an application with the rates,
fares, or charges for the transportation of property
that the water carrier proposes to be effective in the
2026-2557 SB2694 CDl SMA-l.docx 2
HIIIMIIIMIMDnilWIM

Page 3
S.B. NO.
s-
C.D. 1
I third year of the three-year cycle. The application
shall be subject to the review and process
requirements for a standard rate increase application
under section 271G-17(d) and (e).
(d) Beginning July 1, 2029, through June 30, 2033, the
commission may apply the mechanism as follows:
(1) In the first, second, and fourth years, the water
carrier inflationary cost index automatic adjustment
mechanism may be applied annually; and
(2) For the third year, regardless of whether the water
carrier is seeking any rate changes for the
transportation of property, the water carrier shall
submit an application with the rates, fares, or
charges for the transportation of property that the
water carrier proposes to be effective in the third
year. The application shall be subject to the review
and process requirements for a standard rate increase
application under section 271G-17(d) and (e).
(e) Customers eligible for preferential agricultural water
rates under section 269-26.5 shall be exempt from any automatic
adjustment mechanism authorized by this section.”
2026-2557 SB2694 CDl SMA-l.docx
iMiiimniMinniiiiiiii

Page 4 2694
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 271G-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read as follows:
'"'Automatic adjustment mechanism” means any rate adjustment
mechanism that allows a water carrier to change rates between
rate cases."
SECTION 3. Section 271G-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§271G-17 Tariffs of water carriers. (a) Every water
carrier shall file with the [pufeiie—commission, and
print, and keep open to public inspection, tariffs showing all
the rates, fares, and charges for transportation, and all
services in connection therewith, of passengers or property.
The rates, fares, and charges shall be stated in terms of lawful
money of the United States. The tariffs required by this
section shall be published, filed, and posted in [such] the form
and manner, and shall contain [eueh] information [ao- the]
prescribed by the commission by [regul-ataens—
end the] rules. The commission may reject any tariff filed with
it [whieh] that is not in consonance with this section and with
2026-2557 SB2694 CDl SMA-l.docx 4
iniwiiHiHniiiiiiiHHii

Page 5 S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
the [r-e^H-lationo'. ] rules. Any tariff so rejected by the
commission shall be void and its use shall be unlawful.
(b) No change shall be made in any rate, fare, charge, or
classification, or any rule, regulation, or practice affecting
the rate, fare, charge, or classification, or the value of the
service thereunder, specified in any effective tariff of a water
carrier, except after forty-five days' notice of the proposed
change filed and posted in accordance with subsection (a);
provided that changes to [a—an automatic adjustment
mechanism surcharge approved by the commission may be made after
thirty days' notice of the proposed change filed and posted in
accordance with subsection (a). The notice shall plainly state
the change proposed to be made and the time when it will take
effect. The commission may in its discretion and for good cause
shown allow the change upon notice less than that [he-reift]
specified in this section or modify the requirements of this
section with respect to posting and filing of tariffs either in
particular instances or by general order applicable to special
or peculiar circumstances or conditions.
(c) No water carrier shall engage in the transportation of
passengers or property unless the rates, fares, and charges upon
2026-2557 SB2694 CDl SMA-l.docx 5
HillllMlllilOMMillli

Page 6
S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
which the same are transported by the water carrier have been
filed and published in accordance with this chapter.
(d) Whenever there is filed with the commission any
schedule stating a new rate, fare, or charge [7-] for the
transportation of passengers or property by a water carrier or
any rule, regulation, or practice affecting [eijeh] the rate,
fare, or charge, or the value of the service thereunder, the
water carrier may on its own initiative, or shall by order of
the commission served [pr^ier- to] before the effective date of
the schedule, concurrently file a pro forma statement of account
[whieh-] that shall be prepared under the same form and in the
same manner as prescribed by the commission's uniform system of
accounts.
The commission may^ upon complaint of any interested person
or upon its own initiative at once and, if it so orders, without
answer or other formal pleading by the interested water carrier
or water carriers, but upon reasonable notice, enter upon a
hearing concerning the lawfulness of the rate, fare, or charge,
or the rule, regulation, or practice, and pending the hearing
and the decision by the commission, by delivering to
the affected water carrier or wat^r carriers [aff-eet-Gd- thoreby]
2026-2557 SB2694 CDl SMA-l.docx
miiiiniiiiiiiiisBiiiiini

Page 7
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
a statement in writing of its reasons therefor, may suspend the
operation of the schedule and defer the use of the rate, fare,
or charge[—] or the rule, regulation, or practice. From the
date of ordering a hearing to investigate the lawfulness of the
rate, fare, or charge, the commission shall have up to six
months to complete its investigation. If the commission fails
to issue a final order within the six-month period then the
changes proposed by the water carrier shall go into effect. At
any hearing involving a change in a rate, fare, charge, or
classification [7-] or in a rule, regulation, or practice, the
burden of proof shall be upon the water carrier to show that the
proposed changed rate, fare, charge, classification, rule,
regulation, or practice [7-] is just and reasonable.
(e) When a rate increase application is filed, the
commission may in its discretion and after public notice, and
upon showing by a water carrier of probable entitlement and
financial need, authorize temporary increases in rates, fares,
and charges; provided that the commission shall by order require
the water carrier to keep accurate account in detail of all
amounts received by reason of [sueh-] the increase, specifying by
whom and in whose behalf [-etJeh-] the amounts are paid, and upon
2026-2557 SB2694 CDl SMA-l.docx
lllliWHBMIlWIlllimiSIII

Page 8
S.B. NO. STa
C.D. 1
completion of the hearing and decision by further order require
the interested carrier to refund, with interest, to the persons
in whose behalf [auoh] t^ amounts were paid, [&ueh] the portion
of [&&eh] increased rates or charges by its decision shall
be found not justified. The interest to be paid shall be the
rate of return authorized in the last general rate case
proceedings.
(f) Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (e), any
request to establish an automatic adjustment mechanism made by a
water carrier shall be submitted as a forty-five-day tariff
transmittal filing or as part of a general rate case
application.
(g) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any
law, decision, order, or rule to the contrary, the commission,
upon the application of a water carrier, may waive or exempt a
water carrier from any or all requirements of this chapter or
any applicable decision, order, rule, or other law upon a
determination or demonstration that any requirement or
requirements should not be applied to water carriers or are
otherwise unjust, unreasonable, or not in the public interest.'*
2026-2557 SB2694 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiiiiaiiiiiffliiHiginiwiiHg

Page 9 S.B. NO. ^2
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and
shall be repealed on July 1, 2033; provided that sections 271G-5
and 271G-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the
form in which they read on the day before the effective date of
this Act.
2026-2557 SB2694 CDl SMA-l.docx
MiiiniiiiiuiHmiHi

2694
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 19th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2694, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
232-26

SB No. 2694, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives